Alaska statutes. Title 14. Education, Libraries, and Museums.
Article 12. Alaska Performance Scholarship Program.

Effective dates. —

Section 14, ch. 14, SLA 2010 makes this article effective July 1, 2011.

Sec. 14.43.810.
Alaska performance scholarship program established; regulations.

The Alaska performance scholarship program is established to provide scholarships for high school graduates who are Alaska residents to attend a qualified postsecondary institution in the state.

The department shall, in consultation with the commission, adopt regulations necessary to implement the Alaska performance scholarship program. The commission shall administer the daily operations of the Alaska performance scholarship program and financing of the Alaska performance scholarship program, including the procedures for applying for the scholarships, establishing standards for and ensuring continuing compliance with programmatic standards, and requiring students to apply for other nonloan financial aid, consistent with federal law.

History.

(§ 5 ch 14 SLA 2010; am § 3 ch 74 SLA 2012)

Effect of amendments. —

The 2012 amendment, effective September 14, 2012, in (a), substituted “Alaska performance scholarship program” for “Alaska merit scholarship program”; in (b), inserted “Alaska performance scholarship” preceding “program” three times.

Sec. 14.43.820.
Alaska performance scholarship program; eligibility.

Subject to appropriation, the commission shall award an Alaska performance scholarship to an applicant who

is a resident of the state as defined in AS

01.10.055

;

graduated or will graduate within six months from a high school in the state;

except as provided in (c) of this section, has completed a core academic curriculum of high school level coursework that includes

four years of mathematics, four years of language arts, four years of science, and four years of social studies, one year of which may include a foreign language, an Alaska Native language, fine arts, or cultural heritage; or

three years of mathematics, four years of language arts, three years of science, four years of social studies, and two years of a foreign language or an Alaska Native language;

has a minimum grade-point average in high school of 2.5 or higher; the department shall set by regulation minimum requirements based on a substantially similar standard for districts that do not assign grades;

has achieved a minimum score on a

college entrance examination; or

standardized examination designed to measure a student’s level of preparedness to make the transition to work, as selected by the department; and

is enrolled in good standing in a course of study at a qualified postsecondary institution in this state that is intended to result in the award of a certificate or degree.

The commission shall establish in regulation standards for continuing and regaining eligibility for a scholarship.

The commissioner shall waive a portion of the core academic requirements specified under (a)(3) of this section for not more than 24 additional months after a student graduates from a high school in the state to provide an eligible applicant the opportunity to complete the academic requirements at a qualified postsecondary institution using a scholarship awarded under AS

14.43.825(a)

or at a public high school in the state with a district sponsorship under (f) of this section if the applicant submits a timely application on a form approved by the commissioner and provides satisfactory proof that the applicant was unable to complete the academic requirements under (a)(3) of this section as a result of circumstances beyond the applicant’s control, including

illness or disability;

a lack of reasonable access to the required coursework at a small or remote high school attended by the applicant in the state; and

other circumstances prescribed by regulation adopted by the board.

The commissioner shall approve or deny an application for a waiver submitted under (c) of this section within 30 days after receiving the application.

An applicant who receives a waiver under (c) of this section, shall, within the time granted for the waiver, provide satisfactory proof to the commissioner of completion of the core academic requirements specified under (a)(3) of this section.

Notwithstanding a contrary provision in this title, a school district that agrees to sponsor a student for a waiver under (c) of this section may include a student who has been approved for a waiver under (c) of this section in the student count conducted under AS

14.17.600

as a full-time or part-time student if the student attends a school in the district for the purpose of completing the core academic requirements under (a)(3) of this section.

In this section, “district” has the meaning given in AS

14.17.990

.

History.

(§ 5 ch 14 SLA 2010; am §§ 4, 5 ch 74 SLA 2012)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 2012, in subsection (a) the substitution of “performance” for “merit scholarship program” in the introductory language was made effective September 14, 2012 (instead of April 1, 2013) to correct a manifest error in secs. 4, 30, and 32, SLA 2012.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2012 amendment, in the introductory language of (a), effective September 14, 2012 (see revisor’s note), substituted “performance” for “merit scholarship program”; in (a)(3), effective April 1, 2013, added “except as provided in (c) of this section,” and substituted “curriculum of high school level coursework” for “curriculum in high school”; and added (e) — (g), effective April 1, 2013.

Sec. 14.43.825.
Maximum annual awards.

The maximum annual awards for the Alaska performance scholarships are as follows:

the first award level is $4,755 and requires a

3.5 grade-point average or above; and

very high minimum score on a college entrance examination;

the second award level is $3,566 and requires a

3.0 grade-point average or above; and

high minimum score on a college entrance examination;

the third award level is $2,378 and requires a

2.5 grade-point average or above; and

moderately high minimum score on a college entrance examination.

A student’s eligibility for a scholarship terminates six years after the date the student graduates from high school unless the student qualifies for an extension of time allowed by the department by regulation.

Except as provided in (b) of this section, a student receiving a scholarship may remain eligible for up to eight semesters of enrollment in good standing at a qualified university or college, which may include graduate courses.

Scholarships may be awarded to a full-time student or, if a student is enrolled part time, prorated based on the number of credits. In this subsection, “full time” means enrollment in a course of study that is not less that 12 credits, and “part time” means enrollment in a course of study that is not less than six credits but less than 12 credits.

The amount of a scholarship award may not exceed the amount of the student’s costs of attendance as certified by the postsecondary institution for the purposes of federal financial aid, less any other scholarships or nonloan financial aid awarded to the student.

Payment of a scholarship is subject to appropriation and the availability of funds for expenditure under AS

37.14.750

. If insufficient funds are appropriated or available in a fiscal year to pay all eligible scholarships, the commission may not award a scholarship to a new applicant, and the commission shall pay existing awards on a pro rata basis for that fiscal year.

History.

(§ 5 ch 14 SLA 2010; am §§ 6 — 8 ch 74 SLA 2012)

Effect of amendments. —

The 2012 amendment, effective September 14, 2012, in the introductory language of (a), substituted “Alaska performance scholarships” for “Alaska merit scholarship program scholarships”, added the subparagraph designations in (a)(1)-(3) and made related stylistic changes; and rewrote (f), adding the references to availability of funds under AS

37.14.750

and to the fiscal year; and effective April 1, 2013, substituted “date the student graduates” for “date the student graduated” in (b).

Sec. 14.43.830.
Qualified postsecondary institutions.

The following institutions are qualified postsecondary institutions for purposes of awarding an Alaska performance scholarship:

a university or college physically located in the state that

is authorized to operate in the state under AS

14.48.020

or is exempt from authorization under AS

14.48.030(b)(1)

;

is accredited by a regional or national accreditation association;

has an advisory program established for incoming students that provides counseling related to course selection, career choice, and personal challenges; and

provides courses and credits that can result in the issuance of a degree or certificate available at the institution within a time frame expected for that degree or certificate;

a career and technical school program physically located in the state that meets the standards established in (a)(1)(C) and (D) of this section and that has been included on a list of certified career and technical school programs received from the Department of Labor and Workforce Development; the commission shall publish the list on or before June 30 of the year preceding enrollment.

The Department of Labor and Workforce Development shall, in consultation with the Department of Education and Early Development, adopt regulations under AS 44.62 (Administrative Procedure Act) establishing criteria under which the Department of Labor and Workforce Development shall certify career and technical school programs in the state as eligible to participate in the Alaska performance scholarship program.

History.

(§ 5 ch 14 SLA 2010; am § 9 ch 74 SLA 2012)

Effect of amendments. —

The 2012 amendment, effective September 14, 2012, in the introductory language of (a), substituted “Alaska performance scholarship” for “Alaska merit scholarship program scholarship”, in (a)(1)(B) inserted “or national” between “regional” and “accreditation”, and in (b), substituted “Alaska performance scholarship program” for “Alaska merit scholarship program”; and effective July 1, 2013, added (a)(1)(C), (a)(1)(D), and made stylistic changes, and in (a)(2), added “meets the standards established in (a)(1)(C) and (D) of this section and that”, following “located in the state that”.

Sec. 14.43.840.
Report to the legislature.

To the extent permitted under law, the department, the commission, the University of Alaska, and the Department of Labor and Workforce Development shall share data necessary to prepare public reports regarding the program.

Not more than 10 days after the convening of each regular legislative session, the department, the commission, the University of Alaska, and the Department of Labor and Workforce Development shall present an annual report to the public, the governor, and the legislature containing information of public interest regarding the program, including

the number of applicants and number and types of scholarships awarded;

the dollar amount of scholarships awarded in past years and the dollar amount expected to be awarded for the next year; and

data and trends in the data regarding high school and postsecondary student performance, programmatic changes, and retention and graduation rates over time.

History.

(§ 5 ch 14 SLA 2010)

Sec. 14.43.849.
Definitions.

In AS

14.43.810

—

14.43.849

, unless the context requires otherwise,

“department” means the Department of Education and Early Development;

“grade-point average” means the average of all grades on a four-point scale, or five-point scale for advanced placement classes, obtained by the student in high school;

“high school” means a public or accredited secondary school in the state and a home school program that is approved by the department;

“program” means the Alaska performance scholarship program established under AS

14.43.810

—

14.43.849

;

“school district” means a borough school district, a city school district, a regional educational attendance area, and a state boarding school.

History.

(§ 5 ch 14 SLA 2010; am § 10 ch 74 SLA 2012)

Revisor’s notes. —

This section was enacted as AS 14.43.850; renumbered in 2010 as AS

14.43.849

, at which time internal references to this section were also conformed.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2012 amendment, effective September 14, 2012, in (4), substituted “Alaska performance scholarship program” for “Alaska merit scholarship program”.